Washington statutes.
RCW 18.73.081

Duties of secretary—Minimum requirements to be prescribed.

In addition to other duties prescribed by law, the secretary shall:

(1) Prescribe minimum requirements for:

(a) Ambulance, air ambulance, organ transport vehicles, and aid vehicles and equipment;

(b) Ambulance and aid services; and

(c) Minimum emergency communication equipment;

(2) Adopt procedures for services that fail to perform in accordance with minimum requirements;

(3) Prescribe minimum standards for first responder and emergency medical technician training including:

(a) Adoption of curriculum and period of certification;

(b) Procedures for provisional certification, certification, recertification, decertification, or modification of certificates;

(c) Adoption of requirements for ongoing training and evaluation, as approved by the county medical program director, to include appropriate evaluation for individual knowledge and skills. The first responder, emergency medical technician, or emergency medical services provider agency may elect a program of continuing education and a written and practical examination instead of meeting the ongoing training and evaluation requirements;

(d) Procedures for reciprocity with other states or national certifying agencies;

(e) Review and approval or disapproval of training programs; and

(f) Adoption of standards for numbers and qualifications of instructional personnel required for first responder and emergency medical technician training programs;

(4) Prescribe minimum requirements for liability insurance to be carried by licensed services except that this requirement shall not apply to public bodies; and

(5) Certify emergency medical program directors.

[ 2023 c 290 s 10; 2022 c 136 s 3; 1993 c 254 s 1; 1990 c 269 s 24; 1988 c 111 s 1; 1987 c 214 s 7.]